Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF597.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2889YH (3) 91 ss/ns H.F. 597 Section 1. SHORT TITLE. This Act shall be known and may be 1 cited as the âOne Bill, One Number Actâ. 2 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 2.34 Numbering of legislative bills 3 and resolutions. 4 1. A bill or resolution, in whatever form, that has been 5 introduced in a chamber of the general assembly and assigned 6 a file number shall retain that file number for the duration 7 of the legislative process and shall not be assigned any other 8 file number, including during consideration by committees and 9 subcommittees and debate in either chamber of the general 10 assembly. A bill or resolution introduced in a chamber shall 11 not receive a number by the chamber other than a file number. 12 2. This section shall not be construed to limit the ability 13 of a legislator, legislative committee, or chamber of the 14 general assembly to amend or substitute a bill or resolution. 15 3. The legislative council and legislative services agency 16 shall adopt policies and procedures as necessary to implement 17 the provisions of this section, including by modifying bill 18 tracking systems and legislative reporting mechanisms. 19 4. It is the intent of the general assembly that this 20 section be liberally construed to provide clarity for 21 legislators and members of the public in tracking bills and 22 participating in state government. 23 Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 24 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 25